Utah statutes.
72-10-118.   Reason for division order to be stated -- Closing airports --
Notice -- Right of inspection.
(1)  If the division rejects an application for permission to operate or
establish an airport, or issues any order under this chapter that requires or
prohibits certain actions, its order shall:
(a)  contain the reasons for the rejection or order; and
(b)  state the requirements to be met before approval will be given or the
order changed.
(2)  The division may order the closing of any airport until its requirements
have been fulfilled.
(3) (a)  An airport not meeting the standards required by the division shall:
(i)  be given notice of its noncompliance; and
(ii)  have 10 days from the receipt of that notice to respond to the division
with a plan and schedule for compliance.
(b)  If the airport fails to respond within the required time, the division
may revoke the airport license and close the airport.
(4)  The division and any state, county, or municipal officer charged with the
duty of enforcing this chapter may inspect and examine at reasonable hours any
premises, buildings, or other structures where regulated airports are
operated.
